District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.68

Effects clause.

Any practice which has the effect or consequence of violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to be an unlawful discriminatory practice.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 268, 24 DCR 6038
1981 Ed., § 1-2532.
1973 Ed., § 6-2278.